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DTC C 1203 / 53 Engine and ECT ECU Communication
Circuit Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The circuit is used to send TRC & VSC control information from the ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU to the
engineandECTECU(TRC+,TRC −),andenginecontrol information fromtheengineandECTECUto the
ABS&BA&TRC&VSCECU(ENG+,ENG −).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1203 /53

Eitherof the following 1.or2.continues for5sec.:
1.ECUIG 1 terminal voltage is9.5V to 17.0Vanddata

transmission to the engine and ECT ECU is impossible.
2.ECUIG 1 terminal voltage is9.5V to 17.0V,engine

speed is 500 rpm or more or vehicle speed is 60 km/h
(36 mph) or more and data receiving from the engine
and ECT ECU is
impossible.

STRC+orTRC − circuit
SENG+orENG − circuit
SEngineandECTECU

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the engine and ECT ECU communication circuit, the ECU prohibits TRC & VSC control.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU communication.

(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
(b) Connect the oscilloscope to the each of terminals ENG+

or TRC+ and GND of the ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.
CHECK:
Start the engine, and check the signal waveform.

NG Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

OK

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each of ter-
minalsENG+,ENG −,TRC+,TRC − ofABS&BA&TRC&VSCECUandengine
and ECT ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine and ECT ECU.


